Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-221
Liquidation; insolvency; injunction to prevent transaction of business.

If the judge of the district court of the county where the suit is filed is absent therefrom, any judge of the Court of Appeals or Supreme Court may grant the injunction as provided in section 8-220 with the same force and effect as if it had been granted by the district judge. All the proceedings for the conduct of the suit and an entry of judgment shall be conducted in the district court of the county where the trust company was chartered. If the trust company is adjudged insolvent, its affairs shall be wound up by the Department of Banking and Finance under and subject to the order of the district court in the manner provided in the case of insolvent banks.

Laws 1927, c. 35, § 3, p. 164;

Laws 1929, c. 38, § 6, p. 160;

C.S.1929, § 8-215;

Laws 1933, c. 18, § 81, p. 178;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 8-215;

R.S.1943, § 8-221;

Laws 1991, LB 732, § 14;

Laws 1993, LB 81, § 36.